Hawaii statutes.
§448E-13 Exemption of public utility and
community antennae television company personnel. [Repeal and
reenactment on June 30, 2018. L 2013, c 65, §4.] (a) The
following persons shall be exempt from this chapter:

(1) All employees of a public utility within the
State under a franchise or charter granted by the State which is regulated by
the public utilities commission and community antennae television company,
while so employed; and

(2) Employees of an electrical contractor duly
licensed under chapter 444; provided that:

(A) Such contractor is retained by a public
utility within the State under a franchise or charter granted by the State
which is regulated by the public utilities commission to perform high voltage
(six hundred volts or higher) electrical work for the public utility; and

(B) Such employees are deemed qualified by
the public utility to perform such high voltage electrical work;

provided further that in no circumstance shall
such persons be less qualified than the public utility's own employees that
perform such high voltage electrical work.

(b) Persons retained by a public utility
pursuant to [subsection] (a)(2) shall be exempt from the provisions of section
444-9.5. [L 1971, c 183, §3; am L 1972, c 196, §6; am L 2013, c 65, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next